Utah statutes.
78A-11-104.    Expenses -- Per diem.
(1) (a) Members who are not government employees shall receive no compensation
or benefits for their services, but may receive per diem and expenses incurred
in the performance of the member's official duties at the rates established by
the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(b)  Members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.
(2)(a)  State government officer and employee members who do not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from their agency for their service may receive
per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties
from the commission at the rates established by the Division of Finance under
Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(b)  State government officer and employee members may decline to receive per
diem and expenses for their service.
(3)  Legislators on the commission shall receive compensation and expenses as
provided in Section 36-2-2 and Legislative Joint Rules Title 5, Chapter 3,
Expense and Mileage Reimbursement for Authorized Legislative Meetings, Special
Sessions, and Veto Override Sessions.
